Massachusetts, session 194th, H1493.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1A of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 358 
of the acts of 2020, is hereby further amended by inserting after the definition of “MBTA 
Community” the following definition: - 
“Movable tiny house", a transportable dwelling unit built on a frame or chassis with not 
more than 400 square feet, excluding lofts, projections from bay windows, open decks, porches 
or exterior utility and storage compartments, intended for residential use on an individual house 
lot where single-family dwellings are allowed or as an accessory dwelling unit. 
SECTION 2. Section 3 of said chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
adding the following 5 paragraphs: - 

of 3 10  The Massachusetts Department of Transportation, registry of motor vehicles and the 
Secretary of the commonwealth shall establish a new category for movable tiny houses. The 
registry of motor vehicles shall establish a process to apply for, issue and cancel certificates of 
title for movable tiny houses that meet all additional safety and equipment requirements 
established by the registry of motor vehicles; provided, however, that the registration fee 
for said certificates of titles for movable tiny houses and manufactured movable tiny houses shall 
be $100. 
A “movable tiny house” shall be permanently affixed to a chassis approved by the 
Massachusetts Department of Transportation capable of carrying the total weight of the structure 
and the exterior width shall not exceed any dimension prohibited by the Massachusetts 
Department of Transportation for movement on a public way or highway; provided further, that a 
“movable tiny house” shall be built in conformance with the regulations and standards of the 
state building code but shall not be required to have insulation in walls, floors and total ceiling 
assembly exceeding R13, R19 and R25 respectively. 
A movable tiny house may be placed on a lot as defined in section 1A of chapter 40A of 
the General Laws and lived in for not less than 180 days before an on-site inspection; provided, 
however, that after 180 days, a movable tiny house shall be required to have an established 
address, energy and water source and wastewater system; provided further, that after 180 days 
the authority having jurisdiction of said lot shall provide for the inspection of the moveable tiny 
house by either the local authority having jurisdiction or a certified member of a third-party 
inspection agency and if the moveable tiny house meets the standards of the inspection a 
certificate of occupancy shall be issued. 

of 3 32  Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a city or town may establish 
less restrictive rules and regulations than are permitted by this section; provided, however, that a 
city or town shall not establish design criteria having the effect of excluding movable tiny 
houses. 
A city or town may incentivize hosted parking of movable tiny houses with tax 
abatements or other tax incentives.